Washington statutes.
RCW 2.43.070

Testing, certification of interpreters.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 1174-S2.SL) ***

(1) Subject to the availability of funds, the administrative office of the courts shall establish and administer a comprehensive testing and certification program for language interpreters.

(2) The administrative office of the courts shall work cooperatively with community colleges and other private or public educational institutions, and with other public or private organizations to establish a certification preparation curriculum and suitable training programs to ensure the availability of certified interpreters. Training programs shall be made readily available in both eastern and western Washington locations.

(3) The administrative office of the courts shall establish and adopt standards of proficiency, written and oral, in English and the language to be interpreted.

(4) The administrative office of the courts shall conduct periodic examinations to ensure the availability of certified interpreters. Periodic examinations shall be made readily available in both eastern and western Washington locations.

(5) The administrative office of the courts shall compile, maintain, and disseminate a current list of interpreters certified by the office.

(6) The administrative office of the courts may charge reasonable fees for testing, training, and certification.

[2005 c 282 s 4; 1989 c 358 s 7. Formerly RCW 2.42.260.]

NOTES:

Severability—1989 c 358: See note following RCW 2.43.010.